Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.130

ESD board—Vacation of board member position because of failure to attend meetings.

Absence of any educational service district board member from four consecutive regular meetings of the board, unless excused on account of sickness or otherwise authorized by resolution of the board, shall be sufficient cause for the members of the educational service district board to declare by resolution that such board member position is vacated.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 10; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.21.037.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.